Idaho statutes. Title 65 SERVICE MEMBERS — VETERANS — SPOUSES AND DEPENDENTS
Chapter 6
SERVICE OFFICERS FOR AID OF VETERANS

Sec.

§ 65-601. Service officer appointed to aid veterans or dependents.

The board of county commissioners of any county in the state shall have power and authority and in its discretion may appoint a service officer whose duty it shall be to give aid and assistance to any veteran, widow, widower or dependent thereof in applying to the federal or state veterans’ agencies for all benefits and aid to which the veteran, widow, widower or dependent thereof is entitled by federal, state or local laws, rules or regulations. Such appointment may, in the discretion of the board of county commissioners, be a separate office or additional duty imposed upon an existing county official, or at the discretion of the board, such appointment may be made, and the expenses and salary thereof financed in conjunction with any service organization or organizations operating within the county.

§ 65-602. Compensation and office of service officer.

The board of county commissioners shall fix the compensation, or a county contribution to the salary, of such service officer, provide the individual with an office and the necessary equipment therefor in the same manner as is provided for any other county officer under the provisions of section 31-1001, Idaho Code, and shall make provision in the budget for the employment of such service officer and the expense for the proper maintenance of such office. Payments therefor shall be from the general tax fund of the county or out of other available funds not otherwise appropriated.